Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,161
Merger of districts; board of directors; term of office; election.

The directors serving on the boards of directors of such merging districts shall constitute the first board of directors of the new district if the merger is approved. Such board of directors shall determine a method of setting the terms of office, so that two directors' terms on the new board shall be for one year, two for two years and three for three years. Each year thereafter two directors shall be elected for a term of three years.

Laws 1972, LB 1509, § 9.